New York, session 2025-2026, S10410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 74 of the public officers law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph j to read as follows: 3 j. No member of the legislature, or legislative employee shall use any 4 confidential or non-public information obtained in the course of their 5 official duties to personally profit or avoid loss in the predictive 6 markets or assist another person, including a spouse, child or other 7 family member, or others in profiting or avoiding loss from partic- 8 ipation in predictive markets. For purposes of this paragraph, the term 9 "predictive markets" shall mean any exchange traded platform or service 10 where participants buy and sell contracts based on the outcome of future 11 events including but not limited to political, economic, weather or 12 other contingencies. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15434-02-6